Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-367
Violations; penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions adopted under section 75-363 or 75-364 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1986, LB 301, § 5;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 79.